lt-LT: Binokuliaro / monokuliaro dizainas: Astronomija; Paukščių stebėjimas; Kompaktiškas; Medžioklė; Infraraudonųjų spindulių; Jūriniai; Naktinis matymas; Opera; Standartiniai; Terminiai; Priartinantys; Kita
ko: 쌍안경/단안경 디자인: 천문학; 조류 관찰; 콤팩트; 사냥; 적외선; 바다; 야간 시야; 오페라; 표준; 열감지; 줌; 기타
fi: Kiikarin/monokulaarin muotoilu: Tähtitiede; Lintujen tarkkailu; Kompakti; Metsästys; Infrapuna; Merikalat; Yönäkö; Ooppera; Tavallinen; Lämpö; Zoomaus; Muu
tr: Binoküler/Monoküler tasarım: Astronomi; Kuş gözlem; Kompakt; Avcılık; Kızılötesi; Deniz balığı; Gece görüşü; Opera; Standart; Termal; Yakınlaştırma; Diğer
pt-BR: Design do binóculo/monóculo: Astronomia; Observação de aves; Compacto; Caça; Infravermelho; Marinho; Visão noturna; Ópera; Padrão; Térmico; Zoom; Outro
zh-TW: 望遠鏡設計: 天文學; 賞鳥; 小巧; 狩獵; 紅外線; 海水魚; 夜間視力; 歌劇; 標準; 熱顯像; 變焦; 其他
da: Design af kikkerter: Astronomi; Fuglekiggeri; Kompakt; Jagt; Infrarød; Marine; Nattesyn; Opera; Standard; Termisk; Zoom; Andet
ja: 双眼鏡/単眼設計: 天文学; バードウォッチング用; コンパクト; 狩猟; 赤外線; 海水; 暗視; オペラ; スタンダード; サーマル; ズーム; その他
cs: Design biokuláru/monokuláru: Astronomie; Pozorování ptáků; Kompaktní; Lov; Infračervená; Mořské; Noční vidění; Opera; Standardní; Tepelné; Zoom; Jiné
vi: Thiết kế hai mắt/một mắt: Thiên văn học; Ngắm chim; Nhỏ gọn; Dao đi săn; Hồng ngoại; Cá biển; Quan sát ban đêm; Opera; Bánh xe tiêu chuẩn; Nhiệt; Thu/phóng; Khác
sl-SI: Zasnova daljnogleda/monokularja: Astronomija; Opazovanje ptic; Kompaktno; Lov; Infrardeča; Pomorska; Nočni vid; Opera; Standardna; Toplotna; Povečava; Drugo
el: Σχεδιασμός διόπτρας με δύο οπτικά πεδία/διόπτρας με ένα οπτικό πεδίο: Αστρονομία; Παρατήρηση πουλιών; Μικρών διαστάσεων; Κυνήγι; Υπέρυθρες; Θάλασσα; Νυχτερινή όραση; Όπερα; Κανονικό; Θερμικά; Ζουμ; Άλλο
it: Design binoculare/monoculare: Astronomia; Osservazione degli uccelli; Compatta; Caccia; Infrarossi; Marino; Visione notturna; Opera; Standard; Termico; Zoom; Altro
fr: Conception des jumelles/du monoculaire: Astronomie; Observation des oiseaux; Compact; Chasse; Infrarouge; Marin; Vision nocturne; Opéra; Standard; Thermique; Zoom; Autre
sv: Design på kikare och monokikare: Astronomi; Fågelskådning; Kompakt; Jakt; Infraröd; Marina; Nattseende; Opera; Standard; Termisk; Zoom; Övrigt
hu: Kétszemes/egyszemes távcső kialakítása: Csillagászat; Madármegfigyelés; Kompakt; Vadászat; Infravörös; Tengeri; Éjjellátó; Opera; Normál; Hőkamerás; Zoom; Egyéb
pt-PT: Design binocular/monocular: Astronomia; Observação de pássaros; Compacto; Caça; Infravermelho; Marinho; Visão noturna; Ópera; Padrão; Térmico; Zoom; Outro
pl: Konstrukcja lornetek i lunet: Astronomia; Obserwowanie ptaków; Kompaktowy; Łowiectwo; Podczerwień; Morski; Widoczność w nocy; Opera; Standard; Termiczny; Powiększenie; Inne
zh-CN: 双筒/单筒设计: 天文学; 观鸟; 压缩式; 狩猎用品; 红外; 海鱼; 夜视; 歌剧; 标准; 保暖; 变焦; 其他
en: Binocular/Monocular design: Astronomy; Bird watching; Compact; Hunting; Infrared; Marine; Night vision; Opera; Standard; Thermal; Zoom; Other
hr-HR: Dizajn dalekozora/monokulara: Astronomija; Promatranje ptica; Kompaktni; Lov; Infracrveno; Pomorski; Noćni vid; Opera; Standardni; Toplinski; Zumiranje; Ostalo
ro-RO: Design binoclu/monoclu: Astronomie; Observarea păsărilor; Compact; Vânătoare; Infraroșu; Marin; Vedere de noapte; Opera; Standard; Termic; Zoom; Altele
bg-BG: Дизайн на бинокъл/монокъл: Астрономия; Наблюдение на птици; Компактен; Лов; Инфрачервен; Морски; Нощно виждане; Опера; Стандартен; Термичен; Увеличение; Други
ru: Тип бинокля или монокуляра: Астрономия; Наблюдение за птицами; Компактный; Охота; Инфракрасный; Морской; Ночное видение; Опера; Стандартный; Тепловой; Увеличение; Другое
sk-SK: Dizajn ďalekohľadov/teleskopov: Astronómia; Pozorovanie vtákov; Kompaktný; Poľovníctvo; Infračervený; Námorný; Nočné videnie; Opera; Štandardný; Termálny; Zoom; Iné
de: Binokulares/Monokulares Design: Astronomie; Vogelbeobachtung; Kompakt; Jagd; Infrarot; Marine; Nachtsicht; Oper; Standard; Thermisch; Zoom; Sonstiges
th: การออกแบบกล้องสองตา/กล้องตาเดียว: ดาราศาสตร์; ดูนก; แบบกะทัดรัด; มีดพราน; อินฟราเรด; ปลาทะเล; การมองเห็นตอนกลางคืน; โอเปรา; มาตรฐาน; เก็บความร้อน; ซูม; อื่นๆ
nb: Kikkert- og monokulardesign: Astronomi; Fugletitting; Kompakt; Jakt; Infrarød; Marint; Nattsyn; Opera; Standard; Termisk; Zoom; Annet
nl: Ontwerp binoculair/monoculair: Astronomie; Vogels kijken; Compact; Jagen; Infrarood; Zoutwatervis; Nachtzicht; Opera; Standaard; Thermisch; Zoom; Andere
es: Diseño de prismáticos/monoculares: Astronomía; Observación de aves; Compacto; Caza; Infrarrojo; Marino; Visión nocturna; Ópera; Estándar; Térmica; Zoom; Otros